Wisconsin, session 2025, AB656.
do enact as follows:AB656,11Section 1. 48.14 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB656,2,2248.14 (6) Consent to marry under s. 765.02, 2023 stats.AB656,23Section 2. 765.02 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 765.02.AB656,34Section 3. 765.02 (2) of the statutes is repealed.AB656,45Section 4. 765.11 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB656,3,136765.11 (1) If any parent, grandparent, child, or natural guardian of a minor 7applicant for a marriage license, any brother, sister, or guardian of either of the 8applicants for a marriage license, either of the applicants, the district attorney, or a 9circuit court commissioner believes that the statements of the application are false 10or insufficient, or that an applicant is adjudicated incompetent without the right to 11marry, that person may file with the court having probate jurisdiction in the county 1in which the marriage license is applied for, a petition under oath, setting forth the 2grounds of objection to the marriage, and asking for an order requiring the parties 3making the application to show cause why the marriage license should not be 4refused. Whereupon, the court, if satisfied that the grounds of objection are prima 5facie valid, shall issue an order to show cause as aforesaid, returnable as the court 6directs, but not more than 14 days after the date of the order, which shall be served 7forthwith upon the applicants for the marriage license residing in the state, and 8upon the clerk before whom the application has been made, and shall operate as a 9stay upon the issuance of the marriage license until further ordered; if either or 10both of the applicants are nonresidents of the state the order shall be served 11immediately upon the nonresident by publication of a class 1 notice, under ch. 985, 12in the county in which the application is pending, and by mailing a copy thereof to 13the nonresident at the address contained in the application.AB656,514Section 5. 765.30 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB656,3,2015765.30 (2) (a) Penalty for false statement. Any person who in any affidavit or 16statement made under s. 765.02 (2), 765.09 or 765.11, willfully and falsely swears, 17or who procures another to swear falsely in regard to any material fact relating to 18the competency of either or both of the parties applying for a marriage license, or as 19to the ages of such parties, if minors, or who falsely pretends to be the parent or 20guardian having authority to give consent to the marriage of such minor.AB656,621Section 6. 767.185 of the statutes is created to read:AB656,4,222767.185 Action for divorce or legal separation by minor. A person who 1is under the age of 18 and who is married may file an action for divorce or legal 2separation.AB656,73Section 7. 767.313 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB656,4,94767.313 (1) (c) A party was 16 or 17 years of age and did not have the consent 5of his or her parent or guardian or judicial approval, or a party was under 16 18 6years of age. Suit may be brought by the underaged party or within 10 years of the 7marriage or by a parent or guardian at any time prior to the party’s attaining the 8age of 18 years, but a parent or guardian must bring suit within one year of 9obtaining knowledge of the marriage.AB656,810Section 8. 948.09 of the statutes is amended to read:AB656,4,1611948.09 Sexual intercourse with a child age 16 or older. Whoever has 12sexual intercourse with a child who is not the defendant’s spouse and who has 13attained the age of 16 years is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the defendant has 14attained the age of 19 years when the violation occurs. This section does not apply 15if the child is the defendant’s spouse and the defendant was a child when the 16marriage occurred.AB656,917Section 9. 948.093 of the statutes is amended to read:AB656,4,2318948.093 Underage sexual activity. Whoever has sexual contact with a 19child who has attained the age of 15 years but has not attained the age of 16 years, 20or whoever has sexual intercourse with a child who has attained the age of 15 years, 21is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the actor has not attained the age of 19 years 22when the violation occurs. This section does not apply if the actor is the child’s 23spouse and the actor was a child when the marriage occurred.AB656,101Section 10. Initial applicability.AB656,5,32(1) The treatment of ss. 948.09 and 948.093 first applies to an act that occurs 3on the effective date of this subsection.AB656,5,54(2) The treatment of s. 767.313 (1) (c) first applies to an action for annulment 5filed on the effective date of this subsection.AB656,5,66